Hawaii statutes.
§263A-8 Test results to be collected.
The results of any test for alcohol content made upon the operator of an
aircraft involved in an accident shall be sent to the state director of
transportation who shall compile the data without revealing the identity of any
individual tested. This data shall be available only to the State and the
administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration, but may be made available
to other government agencies as the director of transportation deems necessary
and advisable. [L 1991, c 274, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next